Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2432.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 SF 2432 (3) 91 dg/ko/mb S.F. 2432 Section 1. Section 135.105B, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. Following development of the voluntary guidelines, 3 cities or counties may elect to utilize the guidelines in 4 developing and administering local programs through city or 5 county health departments on a city, county, or multicounty 6 basis or may request that the state develop and administer 7 the local program. However, cities and counties are not 8 required to develop and administer local programs based upon 9 the guidelines. 10 Sec. 2. Section 135I.1, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 11 to read as follows: 12 2. âLocal board of healthâ means a city, county, or district 13 board of health the same as defined in section 137.102 . 14 Sec. 3. Section 137.102, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are 15 amended by striking the subsections. 16 Sec. 4. Section 137.102, subsection 10, Code 2026, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 10. âLocal board of healthâ means a city, county , board or a 19 district board of health . 20 Sec. 5. Section 137.103, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 21 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 22 following: 23 1. A city shall not maintain a city board of health or a 24 city health department. Each city shall perform the cityâs 25 public health services through the cityâs local board of 26 health. 27 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 137.103A County boards. 28 1. A county board shall execute an agreement with each 29 county hospital located in the county that the county board 30 represents to allow for sharing of facilities, health care 31 services, and administrative resources. 32 2. A county board may submit an application to the 33 department to waive the requirement in subsection 1 by 34 providing the department evidence of all of the following: 35 -1- SF 2432 (3) 91 dg/ko/mb 1/ 2 S.F. 2432 a. The county board has access to an alternative means of 1 providing health services comparable to those provided by the 2 county hospital with which the county board would otherwise be 3 required to contract. 4 b. The alternative means of providing health services is 5 more cost-effective for the county board than contracting with 6 the county hospital. 7 3. A county board that applies for a waiver under subsection 8 2 must submit a letter explaining the county boardâs decision 9 to apply for the waiver to the county boardâs county board of 10 supervisors. 11 Sec. 7. Section 137.104, subsection 1, paragraph b, 12 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended by striking the 13 subparagraph. 14 Sec. 8. Section 137.105, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 15 2026, is amended by striking the paragraph. 16 Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect January 1, 17 2027. 18 -2- SF 2432 (3) 91 dg/ko/mb 2/ 2